Utah statutes.
13-8-2.   Contractual limitations of liability arising from services of
design professionals prohibited.
(1)  As used in this section:
(a)  "Agreement" means a contract, promise, covenant, or understanding.
(b)  "Contractor" means any person engaged by an owner to develop or assist in
the development of the owner's land.
(c)  "Design professional" means an architect, engineer, or land surveyor.  It
includes any other person who, for a fee or other compensation, performs
services similar to the services of an architect, engineer, or land surveyor
in connection with the development of land.
(d)  "Development" means the construction, alteration, repair, maintenance, or
improvement of land, including any related moving, demolition, or excavation.
(e)  "Land" means any real property, including any building, fixture,
improvement, appurtenance, structure, road, highway, or other development.
(f)  "Liability" includes liability arising by contract, indemnity,
contribution, tort, or otherwise.
(g)  "Owner" means the holder of any legal or equitable title or interest in
property.
(h)  "Subcontractor" means any person engaged by a contractor to develop or
assist in the development of land.
(2)  An agreement between an owner and a contractor may not limit the owner's
or a design professional's liability to the contractor for any claim arising
from services performed by the design professional in connection with the
development of land.  This subsection does not apply if the owner and the
contractor are the same person or entity or are controlled by the same person
or entity.
(3)  An agreement between a contractor and a subcontractor may not limit the
owner's or a design professional's liability to the subcontractor for any
claim arising from services performed by the design professional in connection
with the development of land.
(4)  This section does not apply if the design professional is retained under
a single contract to perform both the design and the construction of the
project, such as in a design-build or turn-key project.
(5)  This section may not be construed to affect any limitation of a design
professional's liability to an owner or other design professional that may
exist in an agreement between the owner and the design professional or between
design professionals.
(6)  This section does not affect or impair the obligations of agreements in
existence as of May 1, 1988.
